Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-502
Rental; accrues to temporary school fund.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall place all money received for rental of saline lands in the temporary school fund of the state, subject to the law governing such temporary school fund.

Laws 1889, c. 94, § 6, p. 582;

Laws 1893, c. 22, § 2, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 5877;

C.S.1922, § 5239;

C.S.1929, § 72-502;

Laws 1943, c. 156, § 1, p. 566;

R.S.1943, § 72-502.